ko: 연결 유형: AC 어댑터; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; 셀룰러; 동축; 동축(F형); 복합 비디오; DECT; DVI; 디스플레이 포트; 이더넷; Firewire; HDMI; 적외선; LTE; Micro SD 카드; Micro USB; 미니 USB; Miracast; NFC; 전원 코드선; 파워 스플리터; RCA; 라디오; S비디오; SD 카드; 위성; 썬더볼트; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; 유선; 무선; 무선 동글; 기타
cs: Typ připojení: Adaptér střídavého proudu; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Mobilní; Koaxiální; Koaxiální (typ F); Kompozitní video; DECT; DVI; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infračervená; LTE; Karta Micro SD; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Napájecí kabel; Rozdělovač napájení; RCA; Rádio; S-video; Karta SD; Satelit; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Kabelové; Bezdrátové; Bezdrátový dongle; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta povezivanja: AC adapter; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Mobilna mreža; Koaksijalna veza; Koaksijalna veza (F-tip); Kompozitni videosignal; DECT; DVI; DisplayPort; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infracrveno; LTE; MicroSD kartica; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Kabel za napajanje; Strujni razdjelnik; RCA; Radio; S-video; SD kartica; Satelit; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Žičana; Bežična; Bežični ključ; Ostalo
nb: Tilkoblingstype: AC-adapter; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Celle; Koaksial; Koaksial (F-type); Komposittvideo; DECT; DVI; Displayport; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infrarød; LTE; Micro SD-kort; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Strømledning; Kraftdeler; RCA; Radio; S-video; SD-kort; Satellitt; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Kablet; Trådløs; Trådløs dongel; Annet
sk-SK: Typ pripojenia: AC adaptér; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Bunkový; Koaxiálny; Koaxiálny (typ F); Kompozitné video; DECT; DVI; Port displeja; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infračervený; LTE; Micro SD karta; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Napájací kábel; Rozdeľovač napájania; RCA; Rádio; S-video; SD karta; Satelit; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Drôtový; Bez kostice; Bezdrôtový dongle; Iné
zh-TW: 連線類型: AC變壓器; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; 藍牙; 蜂窩網路; 同軸; 同軸（F 型）; 複合影音; DECT; DVI; 顯示器連接埠; 乙太網路; 火線; HDMI; 紅外線; LTE; 微型 SD 卡; 微型 USB; 迷你 USB; 米拉卡斯特; NFC; 電源線; 功率分配器; RCA; 收音機; S 端子; SD 卡; 衛星; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; 有線; 無線; 無線適配器; 其他
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης: Μετασχηματιστής AC; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Κυψελοειδής; Ομοαξονικό καλώδιο; Ομοαξονική (τύπου F); Σύνθετο σήμα βίντεο; DECT; DVI; DisplayPort; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Υπέρυθρες; LTE; Κάρτα Micro SD; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Καλώδιο τροφοδοσίας; Διαχωριστής ισχύος; RCA; Ραδιοσύνδεση; S-video; Κάρτα SD; Δορυφορική; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Ενσύρματη; Χωρίς μπανέλα; Ασύρματο κλειδί προστασίας; Άλλο
nl: Verbindingstype: AC-adapter; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Mobiel; Coaxiaal; Coaxiaal (F-type); Composietvideo; DECT; DVI; Displaypoort; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infrarood; LTE; Micro SD-kaart; Micro-USB; Mini-USB; Miracast; NFC; Voedingskabel; Stroomsplitter; RCA; Radio; S-video; SD-kaart; Satelliet; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wifi; Bedraad; Draadloos; Draadloze dongel; Andere
hu: Csatlakozás típusa: AC adapter; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Mobil; Koaxiális; Koaxiális (F-típusú); Összetett videó; DECT; DVI; Kijelzőport; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infravörös; LTE; Micro SD-kártya; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Tápkábel; Áramelosztó; RCA; Rádió; S-videó; SD-kártya; Műhold; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Vezetékes; Vezeték nélküli; Vezeték nélküli hardverkulcs; Egyéb
sv: Anslutningstyp: Växelströmsadapter; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Cellulär; Koaxial; Koaxial (F-typ); Kompositvideo; DECT; DVI; Skärmport; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infraröd; LTE; Micro SD-kort; Micro USB; Mini-USB; Miracast; NFC; Strömsladd; Kraftdelare; RCA; Radio; S-video; SD-kort; Satellit; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Trådbunden; Trådlös; Trådlös dongel; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação: Adaptador CA; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Celular; Coaxial; Coaxial (Tipo F); Vídeo composto; DECT; DVI; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infravermelho; LTE; Cartão Micro SD; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Cabo de energia; Divisor de energia; RCA; Rádio; S-vídeo; Cartão SD; Satélite; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Com fios; Sem fios; Dongle sem fios; Outro
da: Tilslutningstype: AC-adapter; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Cellulær; Koaksial; Koaksial (F-type); Kompositvideo; DECT; DVI; Displayport; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infrarød; LTE; Micro SD-kort; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Strømkabel; Strømfordeler; RCA; Radio; S-video; SD-kort; Satellit; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Kablet; Trådløs; Trådløs dongle; Andet
fi: Liitostyyppi: Vaihtovirta-adapteri; ANT+; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Solu; Koaksiaalinen; Koaksiaalinen (F-tyyppi); Komposiittivideo; DECT; DVI; Näyttöportti; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infrapuna; LTE; Micro SD -kortti; Micro USB; Mini-USB; Miracast; NFC; Virtajohto; Tehonjakaja; RCA; Radio; S-video; SD-kortti; Satelliitti; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Langallinen; Langattomat; Langaton dongle; Muu
en: Connection type: AC adapter; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Cellular; Coaxial; Coaxial (F-Type); Composite video; DECT; DVI; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infrared; LTE; Micro SD card; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Power cord; Power splitter; RCA; Radio; S-video; SD card; Satellite; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Wired; Wireless; Wireless dongle; Other
vi: Loại kết nối: Bộ chuyển đổi AC; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Di động; Đồng trục; Đồng trục (Loại F); Video tổng hợp; DECT; DVI; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Hồng ngoại; LTE; Thẻ micro SD; Micro USB; USB mini; Miracast; NFC; Dây nguồn; Bộ chia nguồn; RCA; Radio; S-video; Thẻ SD; Vệ tinh; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Có kết nối dây; Không dây; Dongle không dây; Khác
ro-RO: Tip conexiune: Adaptor CA; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Celular; Coaxial; Coaxial (Tip F); Video compozit; DECT; DVI; Port de afișare; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infraroșu; LTE; Card micro SD; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Cablu de alimentare; Divizor de curent; RCA; Radio; S-video; Crd SD; Satelit; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Cablată; Fără sârmă; Dongle wireless; Altele
pl: Typ połączenia: Zasilacz AC; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Komórkowy; Współosiowy; Współosiowy (typ F); Złącze komponentowe wideo; DECT; DVI; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Podczerwień; LTE; Karta MicroSD; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Przewód zasilający; Rozdzielacz mocy; RCA; Radio; S-video; Karta SD; Satelita; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Przewodowy; Bezprzewodowy; Klucz bezprzewodowy; Inne
it: Tipo di connessione: Adattatore CA; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Cellulare; Coassiale; Coassiale (tipo F); Video composito; DECT; DVI; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infrarossi; LTE; Scheda microSD; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Cavi elettrici; Divisore di potenza; RCA; Radio; S-video; Scheda SD; Satellitare; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Cablata; Senza fili; Chiavetta wireless; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta povezave: AC adapter; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Mobilna; Koaksialna; Koaksialna (F-vrsta); Kompozitna video; DECT; DVI; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infrardeča; LTE; Micro SD kartica; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Napajalni kabel; Razdelilnik moči; RCA; Radio; S-video; SD kartica; Satelit; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Žična; Brezžično; Brezžični ključek; Drugo
fr: Type de connexion: Adaptateur pour courant alternatif; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Cellulaire; Coaxiale; Coaxial (type F); Vidéo composite; DECT; DVI; Port d’affichage; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infrarouge; LTE; Carte Micro SD; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Cordon d'alimentation; Répartiteur d’alimentation; RCA; Radio; S-vidéo; Carte SD; Satellite; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Filaire; Sans fil; Clé sans fil; Autre
ja: 接続タイプ: ACアダプター; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; セルラー; 同軸; 同軸 (Fタイプ); コンポジット映像; DECT; DVI; ディスプレイポート; イーサネット; Firewire; HDMI; 赤外線; LTE; マイクロSDカード; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; 電源コード; パワースプリッター; RCA; 無線機; S映像; SDカード; サテライト; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; 有線; 無線; 無線ドングル; その他
es: Tipo de conexión: Adaptador de CA; ANT; ANT+; Auxiliar; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Celular; Coaxial; Coaxial (tipo F); Video compuesto; DECT; DVI; Puerto de pantalla; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infrarrojo; LTE; Tarjeta micro SD; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Cable de alimentación; Divisor de potencia; RCA; Radio; S-video; Tarjeta SD; Satélite; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Cableado; Inalámbrico; Llave inalámbrica; Otros
zh-CN: 连接类型: AC 适配器; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; 蓝牙; 蜂窝状; 同轴; 同轴（F 型）; 复合视频信号; DECT; DVI; 显示端口; 以太网; 火线; HDMI; 红外; LTE; 微型 SD 卡; Micro USB; 迷你 USB; 无线显示; NFC; 电源线; 功率分配器; RCA; 收音机; 超级视频; SD 卡; 卫星; 雷电接口; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; 有线; 无线; 无线适配器; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão: Adaptador AC; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Celular; Coaxial; Coaxial (Tipo F); Vídeo composto; DECT; DVI; Porta de exibição; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Infravermelho; LTE; Cartão micro SD; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Cabo de alimentação; Divisor de energia; RCA; Rádio; S-vídeo; Cartão SD; Satélite; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Com fio; Sem fio; Dongle sem fio; Outro
bg-BG: Тип връзка: Адаптер за променлив ток; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Мобилна; Коаксиална; Коаксиална (тип F); Композитно видео; DECT; DVI; Порт за дисплей; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Инфрачервена; LTE; Micro SD карта; Micro USB; Мини USB; Miracast; NFC; Захранващ кабел; Разпределител на мощността; RCA; Радио; S-video; SD карта; Сателит; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; С кабел; Безжична; Безжичен донгъл; Други
de: Verbindungstyp: AC-Adapter; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Mobilfunk; Koaxial; Koaxial (F-Typ); Composite Video; DECT; DVI; Display-Port; Ethernet; FireWire; HDMI; Infrarot; LTE; Micro-SD-Karte; Micro USB; Mini-USB; Miracast; NFC; Netzkabel; Leistungsteiler; RCA; Radio; S-Video; SD-Karte; Satellit; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Kabelgebunden; Kabellos; WLAN-Dongle; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Ryšio tipas: AC adapteris; ANT; ANT+; AUX; „AirPlay“; BNC; „Bluetooth“; Korinis; Bendraašė; Bendraašė (F tipo); Kompozitinė vaizdo; DECT; DVI; Ekrano prievadas; Eterneto; „Firewire“; HDMI; Infraraudonųjų spindulių; LTE; „Micro SD“ kortelė; „Micro USB“; „Mini USB“; „Miracast“; NFC; Maitinimo laidas; Galios skirstytuvas; RCA; Radijo imtuvas; S vaizdo; SD kortelė; Palydovinė; „Thunderbolt“; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Laidinė; Belaidė; Belaidis raktas; Kita
ru: Тип подключения: Адаптер переменного тока; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Сотовое; Коаксиальное; Коаксиальное (тип F); Композитное видео; DECT; DVI; Порт дисплея; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Инфракрасный; LTE; Карта Micro SD; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Шнур питания; Разветвитель мощности; RCA; Радио; S-Video; Карта SD; Спутниковое; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Проводное; Беспроводное; Беспроводной ключ; Другое
tr: Bağlantı Türü: AC adaptörü; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; Bluetooth; Hücresel; Koaksiyel; Koaksiyel (F-Tipi); Kompozit video; DECT; DVI; DisplayPort; Ethernet; Firewire; HDMI; Kızılötesi; LTE; Mikro SD kart; Micro USB; Mini USB; Miracast; NFC; Güç kablosu; Güç ayırıcı; RCA; Radyo; S-video; SD kart; Uydu; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Kablolu; Kablosuz; Kablosuz donanım kilidi; Diğer
th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อ: อะแดปเตอร์ AC; ANT; ANT+; AUX; AirPlay; BNC; บลูทูธ; เครือข่ายมือถือ; โคแอกเซียล; โคแอกเชียล (ชนิด F); สัญญาณวิดีโอแบบคอมโพสิต; DECT; DVI; พอร์ตแสดงผล; อีเทอร์เน็ต; ไฟร์ไวร์; HDMI; อินฟราเรด; LTE; การ์ด Micro SD; ไมโคร USB; มินิ USB; Miracast; NFC; สายไฟ; อุปกรณ์แบ่งสัญญาณ; RCA; วิทยุ; S-video; การ์ด SD; ระบบจานดาวเทียม; Thunderbolt; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; แบบมีสาย; แบบไร้สาย; ดองเกิลไร้สาย; อื่นๆ